Utah statutes.
31A-22-1408.   Right of return -- Notice.

Individual long-term care insurance policyholders and certificate holders other than employee and labor union certificate holders have the right to return the policy within 30 days of its delivery and to have the premium refunded if the policyholder is not satisfied for any reason after examination of the policy.  Individual long-term care insurance policies shall have a notice prominently printed on the first page of the policy or attached to the policy stating in substance that the policyholder has the right to return the policy within 30 days of its delivery and to have the premium refunded if the policyholder is not satisfied for any reason after examination of the policy.

